Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1.
do enact as follows:SB1,12Section 1. Nonstatutory provisions.SB1,1,33(1) Individual income tax rebate for 2026.SB1,2,51(a) Subject to the limitations and conditions under this subsection, a taxpayer 2who is an individual and who filed a Wisconsin individual income tax return for the 3taxpayer’s taxable year beginning after December 31, 2023, and before January 1, 42025, is eligible to receive a rebate that is equal to $1,000 for married persons who 5filed a joint return for that taxable year and $500 for all other individuals.SB1,2,86(b) The rebate under par. (a) may not exceed the taxpayer’s net income tax 7liability under chapter 71 for the taxpayer’s taxable year beginning after December 831, 2023, and before January 1, 2025.SB1,2,159(c) The department of revenue shall identify the taxpayers who are eligible to 10receive a rebate under par. (a) and the amount of payment due each taxpayer. The 11department of revenue shall certify the allowable amount of the rebate to the 12department of administration for payment by check, share draft, or other draft 13drawn from the appropriation account under s. 20.835 (2) (cd). The department of 14administration shall make the payments under this paragraph no later than 15September 15, 2026.SB1,2,2116(d) The department shall establish procedures for taxpayers who do not 17receive a rebate or receive less than the full amount for which they are eligible 18under this subsection to file a claim for payment by December 31, 2026. The 19department of revenue shall establish a portal on its Internet site for these 20individuals to file a claim for payment. No taxpayer may make a claim for a 21payment under this paragraph after December 31, 2026.SB1,3,322(e) Section 71.80 (3) and (3m), as it applies to income tax refunds, applies to a 23rebate under this subsection. The department may enforce the rebate under this 24subsection and may take any action, conduct any proceeding, and proceed as it is 1authorized with respect to taxes under ch. 71. The income tax provisions in ch. 71 2relating to assessments, refunds, appeals, collection, interest, and penalties apply 3to the rebates under this subsection.SB1,3,44